Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1846XS (4) 91 cm/jh S.F. 291 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 720.6A Vexatious litigation. 1 A person or personâs counsel that files, brings, defends, 2 or asserts a civil claim against another person in bad faith 3 or without a reasonable basis in law or fact commits a serious 4 misdemeanor. 5